Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 24. Financing of Jobs Development

154.24-010.
Definitions for KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150.

The following words and terms, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning, shall have the following respective meanings in KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150:

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in KRS 154.22-010;

“Agreement” means the service and technology agreement made pursuant to KRS 154.24-120, between the authority and an approved company with respect to an economic development project;

“Approved company” means any eligible company seeking to locate an economic development project from outside the Commonwealth into the Commonwealth, or undertaking an economic development project in the Commonwealth for which it is approved pursuant to KRS 154.24-100;

“Approved costs” means fifty percent (50%) of the total of the start-up costs up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per new full-time job created and to be held by a Kentucky resident subject to the personal income tax of the Commonwealth, plus fifty percent (50%) of the annual rent for each elapsed year of the service and technology agreement;

“Assessment” means the “service and technology job creation assessment fee” authorized by KRS 154.24-110;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, as created in KRS 154.20-010;

“Average hourly wage” means the wage and employment data published by the Department of Workforce Investment within the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet collectively translated into wages per hour based on a two thousand eighty (2,080) hour work year for the following sectors:

Manufacturing;

Transportation, communications, and public utilities;

Wholesale and retail trade;

Finance, insurance, and real estate; and

Services;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Economic development project” or “project” means a new or expanded service or technology activity conducted at a new or expanded site by:

An approved company; or

An approved company and its affiliate or affiliates;

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity engaged in service or technology and meeting the standards promulgated by the authority in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A;

“Employee benefits” means nonmandated costs paid by an approved company for its full-time employees for health insurance, life insurance, dental insurance, vision insurance, defined benefits, 401(k) or similar plans;

“Final approval” means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible company to receive inducements under this subchapter;

“Full-time employee” means a person employed by an approved company for a minimum of thirty-five (35) hours per week and subject to the state tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

“In lieu of credits” means a local government appropriation to the extent permitted by law, or other form of local government grant or service benefit, directly related to the economic development project and in an amount equal to one percent (1%) of employees’ gross wages, exclusive of any noncash benefits provided to an employee, or the provision by a local government of an in-kind contribution directly related to the economic development project and in an amount equal to one half (1/2) of the rent for the duration of the agreement;

“Inducements” means the tax credits allowed and the assessment authorized by KRS 154.24-110, which are intended to induce companies engaged in service and technology industries to locate or expand in the Commonwealth;

“Person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, trust, unincorporated organization, association, corporation, limited liability company, institution, entity or government, whether federal, state, county, city, or otherwise, including without limitation any instrumentality, division, political subdivision, district, court, agency, or department thereof;

“Preliminary approval” means the action taken by the authority conditioning final approval by the authority upon satisfaction by the eligible company of the requirements under this subchapter;

“Rent” means:

The actual annual rent or leasing fee paid by an approved company to a bona fide entity negotiated at arms length for the use of a building by the approved company to conduct the approved activity for which the inducement has been granted; or

The fair rental value on an annual basis in a building owned by the approved company of the space used by the approved company to conduct the approved activity for which the inducement has been granted as determined by the authority using criteria which is customary in the real estate industry for the type of building being used. The fair rental value shall include an analysis of the cost of amortizing the cost of land and building over the period of time customary in the real estate industry for the type of building and for the land being utilized;

Rent shall include the customary cost of occupancy, including but not limited to property taxes, heating and air-conditioning, electricity, water, sewer, and insurance;

“Service or technology” means either:
(19) (a)

“Service or technology” means either:

Any activity involving the performance of work, except work classified by the divisions, including successor divisions, of agriculture, forestry and fishing, mining, utilities, construction, manufacturing, wholesale trade, retail trade, real estate rental and leasing, educational services, accommodation and food services, and public administration in accordance with the “North American Industry Classification System,” as revised by the United States Office of Management and Budget from time to time, or any successor publication; or

Regional or headquarters operations of an entity engaged in an activity listed in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, “service or technology” shall not include any activity involving the performance of work by an individual who is providing direct service to the public pursuant to a license issued by the state or an association that licenses in lieu of the state unless seventy-five percent (75%) of the services provided by the eligible company from the project are provided to persons located outside the Commonwealth during the period in which it receives the inducements authorized in KRS 154.24-110; and

“Start-up costs” means the acquisition cost associated with the project related to the furnishing and equipping the building for ordinary business functions, including computers, furnishings, office equipment, the relocation of out-of-state equipment, and nonrecurring costs of fixed telecommunication equipment as verified and approved by the authority in accordance with KRS 154.24-130.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 499, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 36, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 338, § 32, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 10, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 149, § 218, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 211, § 73, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 51, effective June 28, 2006; 2008, ch. 50, § 1, effective April 10, 2008; 2009, ch. 11, § 41, effective June 25, 2009; 2019 ch. 146, § 23, effective June 27, 2019.

154.24-020.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that the general welfare and material well-being of citizens of the Commonwealth depends in large measure upon the development and growth of the service and technology industries in the Commonwealth.

The General Assembly hereby finds and further declares that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to induce:

The location of service and technology facilities in the Commonwealth; and

The expansion of existing service and technology industries in the Commonwealth, in order to advance the public purposes of relieving unemployment by creating new jobs in the Commonwealth that, but for the inducements to be offered by the authority to approved companies, would not exist, and of creating new sources of tax revenues for the support of the public services provided by the Commonwealth.

The General Assembly hereby finds and further declares that the authorities granted by KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150 are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended, and that the inducement of:

The location of service and technology facilities in the Commonwealth; and

The expansion of existing service and technology industries in the Commonwealth is of paramount importance, mandating that the provisions of KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150 be liberally construed and applied in order to advance the public purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

154.24-030.
Kentucky Jobs Development Authority. [Repealed.]

154.24-040.
Powers of authority. [Repealed.]

154.24-050.
Personnel.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall provide sufficient personnel to the authority to permit it to adequately discharge its duties and responsibilities described in KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

154.24-060.
Personal liability or accountability of director or officer.

No director or officer of the authority shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any service and technology agreement on behalf of the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

154.24-070.
Acceptance of moneys — Expenditures.

The authority may accept moneys which may be appropriated by the General Assembly, or moneys which may be received from any other source, including, but not limited to, income from the authority’s operations; and expend funds consistent with its purposes, including, but not limited to, the payment of its expenses of administration and operation, and the establishment and maintenance of a reserve or contingency fund.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

154.24-080.
Conflicts of interest.

No director, officer, or employee of the authority shall be interested, directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee of, or have an ownership interest in, any firm or corporation interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract with the authority.

Should a director, officer, or employee of the authority have such an interest or be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any such firm or corporation, then the director, officer, or employee of the authority shall:

Disclose the interest and the office, employment, or ownership in that firm or corporation;

Refrain from participation in discussions relating to any contract of the firm or corporation with the authority; and

Refrain from voting or otherwise taking action on any contract or proposed contract of the authority with the firm or corporation.

If any contract or agreement shall be made in violation of the provisions of this section it shall be null and void and no action shall be maintained against the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 13, effective July 15, 1994.

154.24-090.
Administrative regulations to include criteria for approval of eligible companies.

The authority shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, regarding the approval of eligible companies and economic development projects conducted by those companies. The criteria for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects shall include but not be limited to the following criteria:

A determination by the authority that more than seventy-five percent (75%) of services provided by the eligible company from the proposed project shall be provided for persons located outside the Commonwealth during each year of the period during which it receives inducements as authorized in KRS 154.24-110;

The economic development project shall result in the creation by the eligible company of a minimum of fifteen (15) new full-time jobs for Kentucky residents to be employed by the eligible company and to be held by persons subject to the personal income tax of the Commonwealth at the activation date set forth in the company’s service and technology agreement as described in KRS 154.24-120. The activation date shall occur within two (2) years after the date of the final resolution authorizing the economic development project. The authority may extend the period for compliance with this subsection up to one (1) year from the activation date upon the written application of an eligible company requesting an extension;

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:
(3) (a)

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the Commonwealth; or

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the county in which the project is to be undertaken.

If the base hourly wage calculated in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection is less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage, then the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage. However, for projects receiving preliminary approval of the authority prior to July 1, 2008, the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage existing on January 1, 2007.

In addition to the base hourly wages, the eligible company shall provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wages; however, if the eligible company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wages, the eligible company may qualify under this section if it provides the employees hired by the eligible company as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the applicable base hourly wages through increased hourly wages combined with employee benefits;

If an eligible company receives approval from the authority before July 1, 2008, and locates an economic development project on property that adjoins one (1) of the five (5) regional postsecondary education centers operated and occupied in cooperation with the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, or operated and occupied under the combined efforts of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System and a public four (4) year comprehensive university, the eligible company may alternatively satisfy the requirements of subsection (3) of this section in the following manner:

Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees whose jobs were created as a result of the project with total of base hourly wages plus employee benefits equal to or greater than two hundred percent (200%) of the federal minimum wage, providing that base hourly wages shall be greater than or equal to one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage;

The eligible company shall provide to the authority a statement certifying that the eligible company will seek to provide full-time or part-time employment opportunities for nontraditional students who are enrolled or seek to be enrolled at a regional postsecondary education center; and

The director of the regional postsecondary education center shall provide to the authority a statement asserting that the eligible company is likely to provide appropriate employment opportunities for students and that the economic development project may be reasonably expected to provide meaningful opportunities for technological and infrastructural enhancements;

Written evidence that:

Approval of the economic development project and the resulting inducements to be offered are essential to the creation of new jobs in the Commonwealth by an eligible company in connection with its economic development project; and

No significant number of existing jobs in the Commonwealth will be lost, or adversely affected, due to the designation of an eligible company as an approved company, and to the approval of the eligible company’s economic development project; and

That the economic development project could reasonably and efficiently locate outside of the Commonwealth and, without the inducements offered by the authority, the eligible company would likely locate outside the state.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 37, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 338, § 33, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 73, § 1, effective March 18, 2003; 2007, ch. 2, § 1, effective March 16, 2007; 2007, ch. 69, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 113, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

154.24-100.
Preliminary and final approval of projects — Designation of eligible companies.

With respect to each eligible company making an application to the authority for inducements, and with respect to the economic development project described in the eligible company’s application, the authority shall request materials and make all inquiries respecting the application the authority deems necessary. Upon review of the application and completion of initial inquiries, the authority may, by resolution of the board of directors, give its preliminary approval by designating an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company and authorizing the undertaking of the economic development project, and approve a report as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

A report describing the economic development project as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section shall set out the following:

The name, location, business, and standard industrial classification of the eligible company, and if the standard industrial classification is indicative of other than a service or technology activity, then an explanation of the service or technology activity of the eligible company;

The nature of the economic development project;

The use and projected amounts of the inducements to be available to the eligible company by year; and

Other information the authority may require.

After the adoption of the board’s preliminary approval, an agent designated by the authority shall hold at least one (1) public hearing to solicit public comments regarding the preliminary designation of an eligible company as an approved company and the preliminary authorization of the company’s economic development project. Notice of the public hearing shall be given pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

Unless the board, within one (1) year after the adoption of the resolution prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, gives its final approval by adopting a final resolution which designates the eligible company as an approved company, authorizes the economic development project, and executes a service and technology agreement between the eligible company and the authority, the approved company’s request for designation and economic development project authorization shall be considered denied.

The decision to grant an eligible company the status of approved company shall be solely that of the authority, which the board shall base its decision upon consideration of all information provided.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 38, effective July 15, 1996.

154.24-110.
Tax credits — Employee job assessment fees.

The approved company shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the income tax and one hundred percent (100%) of the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 that would otherwise be due to the Commonwealth by the approved company attributable to the economic development project, as limited by the provisions of this section and KRS 154.24-130. The amount of the approved company’s income, Kentucky gross profits, or Kentucky gross receipts that is attributable to the economic development project shall be determined under KRS 141.407. The ordering of credits shall be as provided in KRS 141.0205.

The tax credit allowed to the approved company shall be subtracted from the approved cost balance in the fiscal year of the approved company for which the tax return of the approved company is filed; and

By October 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth shall certify to the authority, in the form of an annual report, aggregate tax credits claimed on tax returns filed during the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year, and assessments taken by approved companies with respect to their economic development projects during the prior calendar year under this subchapter, and shall certify to the authority, within ninety (90) days from the date an approved company has filed its state tax return, when an approved company has taken tax credits and assessments equal to its total inducements.

The approved company or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of the approved company may require each employee, subject to state tax imposed by KRS 141.020, as a condition of employment, to agree to pay a service and technology job creation assessment fee up to five percent (5%) of the gross wages exclusive of any noncash benefits provided to an employee for each employee whose job has been deemed by the authority to be created as a result of the economic development project, provided that the service and technology job creation assessment fee shall not exceed the amount determined in accordance with KRS 154.24-150(5) if the circumstances in that subsection apply. Where a person is already employed by the approved company at a site other than the site of the economic development project and where that employee is subject to state tax imposed by KRS 141.020, the employee’s job shall be deemed to have been created when the employee is transferred to the site of the economic development project, provided that the employee’s existing job is filled with a new employee.

Each employee paying the assessment shall be entitled to a credit against his Kentucky income tax required to be withheld under KRS 141.310 equal to four-fifths (4/5) of the assessment;

If the assessment has been approved by the local jurisdiction as provided in KRS 154.24-150, each employee paying the assessment also shall be entitled, in the local jurisdiction in which the economic development project is located, to a credit against his local occupational license fee in the form of a simultaneous adjustment of his local occupational license fee withholding equal to one-fifth (1/5) of the assessment. If more than one (1) local tax is incurred, the one-fifth (1/5) assessment shall be prorated proportionately among the taxes unless one (1) local jurisdiction agrees to forgo the receipt of these taxes in an amount equal to the one-fifth (1/5) assessment, in which case no proration need be made;

If an approved company elects to impose the assessment as a condition of employment, it shall be authorized to deduct the assessment from each payment of wages to the employee;

No credit, or portion thereof, shall be allowed against any occupational license fee imposed by or dedicated solely to the board of education in a local jurisdiction;

The approved company collecting an assessment shall make its payroll, books, and records available to the authority when the authority shall request, and shall file with the authority documentation pertaining to the assessment as the authority may require; and

Any assessment of the wages of employees of an approved company in connection with their employment at an economic development project shall permanently cease at the expiration of the agreement.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if a local government in which the project is located has a local occupational license fee that is less than one percent (1%) and agrees to forgo all of its local occupational license fee, then the assessment shall be four percent (4%), all of which shall be contributed by the Commonwealth, plus the percentage of the local occupational license fee that the local government has agreed to forgo. Each employee paying the assessment under this subsection shall be entitled to a credit against Kentucky income tax, under KRS 141.350, equal to four percent (4%) and a credit against the local occupational license fee equal to the local occupational license fee that the local jurisdiction has agreed to forgo.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 39, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 300, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 34, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 580, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 52, effective June 28, 2006.

154.24-120.
Service and technology agreement with respect to company’s economic development project — Contents.

Before any approved company is granted inducements as prescribed in KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150, a service and technology agreement with respect to the company’s economic development project shall be entered into between the authority and the approved company. The terms and provisions of the agreement, including the amount of approved costs, shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the approved company, except that each agreement shall include the following provisions:

The term of an agreement shall not be longer than ten (10) years from the activation date established by the approved company. The activation date shall be any time within two (2) years after the date of final approval of the agreement by the authority. In order to implement the activation date, the approved company shall notify the authority, the Kentucky Department of Revenue, the employees, and the affected local jurisdictions, if any, of the activation date on which implementation of the inducements authorized in the agreement shall occur.

The agreement shall include:

A description of the authorized inducements to be used by the approved company;

A provision that, if the total number of full-time employees at the site of the economic development project who are residents of the Commonwealth and subject to the Kentucky income tax is less than fifteen (15), or in the case of an existing Kentucky business the approved company fails to maintain the increase of at least fifteen (15) full-time employees who are residents of the Commonwealth and subject to the Kentucky income tax, the authorized inducements shall be suspended for a period of up to one (1) year. If the company does not have at least fifteen (15) new full-time employees at the site who are residents of the Commonwealth and subject to Kentucky income tax within one (1) year from the date of the initial suspension, the inducements may be terminated at the discretion of the authority;

A provision that, if seventy-five percent (75%) or less of services provided by the approved company from the economic development project should be provided to persons located outside of the Commonwealth during any fiscal year of the approved company as prescribed in KRS 154.24-090, the authorized inducements shall be suspended for a period of up to one (1) year. If the percentage of these services does not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) within one (1) year from the initial date of suspension, the inducements may be terminated at the discretion of the authority; and

A provision that neither tax credits nor assessments are assignable without written consent by the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 40, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 338, § 35, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 73, § 2, effective March 18, 2003; 2004, ch. 105, § 11, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 581, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 53, effective June 28, 2006.

154.24-130.
Limit on term of inducement after agreement activation date — Effect of excess in assessments.

Before the end of the first year following the activation date, the authority shall, using data supplied by the approved company, verify and determine the total start-up costs for the approved company’s economic development project. The initial approved costs shall be fifty percent (50%) of the start-up cost.

Each year, during the ten (10) year life span of the agreement, fifty percent (50%) of the annualized rental payments shall be added to the unrecouped balance of approved costs.

Each year, the inducement earned and any in lieu of credits received shall be subtracted from the approved costs.

If, in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the agreement is in effect, the accumulated inducements equal the unrecouped remaining balance of the approved costs then expended, the assessments collected from the wages of the employees shall cease for the remainder of that fiscal year of the approved company, and the approved company shall resume normal personal income tax and occupational license fee withholdings from the employees’ wages for the remainder of that fiscal year.

If in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the agreement is in effect, the total of the tax credit granted to the approved company plus the assessment collected from the wages of the employees exceeds the remaining balance of the approved costs then expended, the approved company shall pay the excess to the Commonwealth as income tax or limited liability entity tax as the case may be.

If in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the agreement is in effect the assessment collected from the wages of the employees exceeds the unrecouped remaining balance of the approved costs then expended, the assessment collected from the wages of the employees shall cease for the remainder of that fiscal year of the approved company, the approved company shall resume normal personal income tax and occupational license fee withholdings from the employees’ wages for the remainder of that fiscal year, and the approved company shall remit to the Commonwealth and applicable local jurisdictions their respective shares of the excess assessment collected on the withholding filing date for employees’ wages next succeeding the first date when the approved company collected excess assessments.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 54, effective June 28, 2006.

154.24-140.
Adjustment of inducements.

If an eligible company operates an existing service and technology business in Kentucky, and wishes to expand that business within the Commonwealth, the eligible company may submit an application to the authority to become an approved company and eligible for the inducements offered in KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150.

If an existing business becomes an approved company, the authority shall determine a base level of employment, a base level of state income tax liability, a base level of limited liability entity tax liability, and a base level of services of the approved company for determining eligible credits in remaining years of the approved company’s project period. The base level shall be determined by taking into consideration any seasonal fluctuations or aberrations of employment levels over a preceding three (3) year period. Notwithstanding the determination of a base level of employment, no employee of the existing business who is an employee of such business prior to the date of the preliminary resolution of the authority as prescribed in KRS 154.24-100 shall be subject to assessment.

The authority shall identify, by name, all of the existing employees engaged in the service and technology activity, and these employees shall be exempt from the assessment. If any of these employees cease working in the activity, another employee shall be added to the base level of employment, based on the earliest date of entry into the workforce, and he shall be exempt from the assessment. The authority may negotiate with the approved company a different method of determining the base level of employment which would yield a more equitable result for the approved company, the Commonwealth, local jurisdictions, and the employees.

To become eligible for inducements, the approved company shall create and maintain above the base level of employment an increase at the site of the economic development project of at least fifteen (15) full-time employees who are residents of the Commonwealth, subject to the Kentucky income tax.

The approved company shall continue to pay to the Commonwealth, on an annualized basis during the term of the agreement, the base level of income tax, and limited liability entity tax adjusted on an annual basis to reflect changes in the consumers price index. Any excess income tax or limited liability entity tax owed may be taken as a credit.

If any approved company expands because of an increase in business or because of the commencement of a new line of business, it shall be eligible, at the discretion of the authority, to negotiate a separate and additional agreement to cover the expanded business under the same conditions as authorized for expansion in this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 41, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 338, § 36, effective July 15, 2002; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 55, effective June 28, 2006.

154.24-150.
Approval of application by local jurisdiction under service and technology agreement — Alternative inducements offered — Assessment fees.

Before any agreement as prescribed in KRS 154.24-120 shall become effective, the legislative body of any local jurisdiction which may lose revenue as a result of the inducements offered pursuant to KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150 and which assesses a local occupational license fee shall approve by official action the granting of inducements to the approved company. If a local jurisdiction which satisfies the requirements of the previous sentence of this subsection does not approve the granting of the inducements or does not elect to provide in lieu of credits as described in subsection (2) of this section, then an approved company shall not be permitted to impose assessments against the wages of its employees.

Subject to the prior written approval of the authority of any proposed in lieu of credits, the local government may elect, by vote of its legislative body, to provide for in lieu of credits for the approved company and its economic development project.

If the local government elects to provide in lieu of credits as described in subsection (2) of this section, the assessment authorized by KRS 154.24-110 shall be four percent (4%), one hundred percent (100%) of which shall be permitted as a credit against Kentucky income tax withheld pursuant to KRS 141.350.

If a local jurisdiction in which the economic development project is to be located does not assess a local occupational license fee and does not elect to provide in lieu of credits as described in subsection (2) of this section, the assessment authorized by KRS 154.24-110 shall be four percent (4%), one hundred percent (100%) of which shall be permitted as a credit against Kentucky income tax withheld pursuant to KRS to KRS 141.350.

If a local jurisdiction in which the economic development project is to be located, approves the inducements in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, assesses less than a one percent (1%) local occupational license fee, and does not elect to provide in lieu of credits as described in subsection (2) of this section, then the approved company may require that each employee subject to state tax imposed by KRS 141.020, as a condition of employment, agree to pay a service and technology job creation assessment fee as prescribed in KRS 154.24-110(2) or (3), as applicable, provided that each employee paying the assessment shall only be entitled to credits against his Kentucky income tax as prescribed in KRS 154.24-110(2)(a) or (3), as applicable and to credits against his local occupational license fee to the extent of the local occupational license fee collected by the local jurisdiction.

If a local jurisdiction in which the economic development project is to be located does not assess a local occupational license fee and elects to provide in lieu of credits as described in subsection (2) of this section, then the assessment shall be in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

Subsection (4) of this section shall apply only to those approved companies which enter into service and technology agreements with the authority after July 15, 1996.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 358, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 20, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, §§ 42 and 43, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 300, § 21, effective July 14, 2000.

154.24-151.
Short title for KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150.

KRS 154.24-010 to 154.24-150 shall be known as the Kentucky Jobs Development Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 194, § 35, effective July 15, 1996.

154.24-152.
Deadline for new applications — Governing law for outstanding approved projects.

New applications shall not be accepted or considered under this subchapter on or after June 26, 2009. All outstanding projects with preliminary or final approval under this subchapter as of June 26, 2009, shall continue to be governed by the provisions of this subchapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27, effective June 26, 2009.

154.24-160.
Development of criteria for productivity gains to be used in considering requests for financial assistance. [Renumbered.]